Missouri, session 2026, SB1558.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 160, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 160.231, to read as
follows:
160.231. 1. As used in this section, the following
terms mean:
(1) "Multiple-occupancy restroom or changing area", an
area in a private school building designed or designated to
be used by more than one individual at a time and where
individuals may be in various stages of undress in the
presence of other individuals. The term includes, but is
not limited to, a school restroom, locker room, changing
room, or shower room;
(2) "Sex", the physical condition of being male or
female based on genetics and physiology as identified on the
individual's original birth certificate.
2. A private school that serves students in
prekindergarten to grade twelve may establish, to ensure
privacy and safety, one or more multiple-occupancy restrooms
or changing areas designated as follows:
(1) For the exclusive use of the male sex; or

SB 1558 2
(2) For the exclusive use of the female sex.
3. The provisions of this section shall not apply to
individuals entering a multiple-occupancy restroom or
changing area designated for use by the opposite sex when
entering:
(1) For custodial, maintenance, or inspection purposes;
(2) To render emergency medical assistance; or
(3) As a parent or guardian accompanying their child,
who is eight years of age or younger, with the permission of
the school.
4. (1) No political subdivision shall adopt any
ordinance, rule, or regulation prohibiting a private school
from establishing one or more multiple-occupancy restrooms
or changing areas as provided in this section.
(2) If a political subdivision adopts an ordinance,
rule, or regulation in violation of subdivision (1) of this
subsection, such political subdivision shall pay the
attorney's fees and costs incurred by a private school in
such private school's legal defense against such ordinance,
rule, or regulation.
Section B. Because immediate action is necessary to
protect private schools from liability and allow preparation
for the 2026-27 school year, section A of this act is deemed
necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
health, welfare, peace, and safety, and is hereby declared
to be an emergency act within the meaning of the
constitution, and section A of this act shall be in full
force and effect upon its passage and approval.
✓